src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_nouns.lexc
+NA+Poss+LocDist+3SgObvPoss:iiminikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+LocDist+3SgProxPoss:iimikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:iiminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iimiwaa' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iimiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:iiminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:iima' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:iiman EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:iiminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:iimiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:iiminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:iiman EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+Loc+3PlObvPoss:iimishining EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+Loc+3PlProxPoss:iimishiwaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+Loc+3SgObvPoss:iimishining EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+Loc+3SgProxPoss:iimishing EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3PlObvPoss:iimishinikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3PlProxPoss:iimishiwaakaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3SgObvPoss:iimishinikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3SgProxPoss:iimishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:iimishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iimishiwaa' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iimishiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:iimishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:iimisha' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:iimishan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:iimishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:iimishiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:iimishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:iimishan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:iiminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iimiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iimiwaabanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iimiwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:iiminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:iimibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:iimibanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:iimibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:iiminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:iimiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:iimiwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:iiminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:iimibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:iimibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:iiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iiwaabanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:iiwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:iiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:iibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:iibanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:iibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:iiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:iiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:iiwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:iiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:iibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:iibaniin EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA, Class: NA_Cy                                           !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Class=NA_Cy_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Other@ NA_Class=NA_Cy_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA, Class: NA_Cy, Prefix: NONE, Order: Other               !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Class=NA_Cy_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings
+NA+Dim+Loc:iinsing EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+LocDist:iinsikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+ObvPl:iinsa' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+ObvPl:iinsan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+ObvSg:iinsan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc:iinzhishing EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+LocDist:iinzhishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+ObvPl:iinzhisha' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+ObvPl:iinzhishan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+ObvSg:iinzhishan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+ProxPl:iinzhishag EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+ProxSg:iinzhish EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc:iinzhishidog EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ObvPl:iinsibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ObvPl:iinsibanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ObvPl:iinsibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ObvSg:iinsibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ObvSg:iinsibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ProxPl:iinsibaneg EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ProxPl:iinsibaniig EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ProxSg:iinsiban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+ProxPl:iinsag EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+ProxSg:iins EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Voc:iinsidog EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Loc:iing EncliticRoot ;
+NA+LocDist:iikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+ObvPl:ii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+ObvPl:iin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+ObvSg:iin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+Loc:iishing EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+LocDist:iishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+ObvPl:iisha' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+ObvPl:iishan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+ObvSg:iishan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+ProxPl:iishag EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+ProxSg:iish EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+Voc:iishidog EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl:iibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl:iibanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl:iibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg:iibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg:iibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ProxPl:iibaneg EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ProxPl:iibaniig EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ProxSg:iiban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+ProxPl:iig EncliticRoot ;
+NA+ProxSg: EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Voc:iidog EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA, Class: NA_ShortC                                       !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Class=NA_ShortC_Boundary
0:%>%> NA_Class=NA_ShortC_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA, Class: NA_ShortC                                       !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Stems
nika:nik NA_Class=NA_ShortC_Boundary ;
